North Carolina, session 2025, HB1197.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INCREASE TEACHING FELLOWS AWARDS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-209.62(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) Awards of Forgivable Loans. – The Program shall provide forgivable loans to selected
students to be used at up to 10 selected institutions for completion of a program leading to initial
teacher licensure as follows:
(1) North Carolina high school seniors. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to eight semesters.
(2) Students applying for transfer to a selected educator preparation program at
an institution of higher education. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to six semesters.
(3) Individuals currently holding a bachelor's degree seeking preparation for
teacher licensure. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per semester for up to four semesters.
(4) Students matriculating at institutions of higher education who are changing to
an approved program of study at a selected educator preparation program. –
Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per semester for up
to four semesters.
licensure. For individuals currently holding a bachelor's degree seeking preparation for
teacher licensure, the Program shall provide forgivable loans of up to ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per academic year for up to two academic years. For all other students, the Program
shall provide forgivable loans of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per academic year for up
to four academic years. Forgivable loans may be used for tuition, fees, the cost of books, and
expenses related to obtaining licensure.all expenses related to enrollment in an approved educator
preparation program and obtaining licensure, including tuition, fees, and the cost of books."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning
in the 2026-2027 academic year to all students enrolled in an educator preparation program
participating in the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.

*H1197-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART II. PRIOR TEACHING FELLOWS PROGRAM REVISIONS APPLY
RETROACTIVELY TO ALL TEACHING FELLOWS
SECTION 2.(a) Subsection (c) of Section 8A.4 of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 8A.4.(c) This section applies to applications for the award of funds beginning
in the 2024-2025 academic year.year for all persons participating in the Program, including
teachers who are continuing or entering service repayment beginning in the 2024-2025 academic
year."
SECTION 2.(b) Section 2.14(b) of S.L. 2024-1 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.14.(b) This section is effective July 1, 2023, and applies to applications for
the award of funds beginning in the 2024-2025 academic year.year for all persons participating
in the Program, including teachers who are continuing or entering service repayment beginning
in the 2024-2025 academic year."

PART III. REVISE PROCESS FOR SELECTING INSTITUTIONAL PARTNERS
SECTION 3. G.S. 116-209.62 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-209.62. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program established; administration.
…
(f) Program Selection Criteria. – The Authority shall administer the Program in
cooperation with up to 10 institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation
programs selected by the Commission that represent a diverse selection of both postsecondary
constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and private postsecondary
institutions operating in the State. The Commission shall adopt stringent standards for selection
of the most effective educator preparation programs, including the following:
(1) Demonstrates high rates of educator effectiveness on value-added models and
teacher evaluations, including using performance-based, subject-specific
assessment and support systems, such as edTPA or other metrics of evaluating
candidate effectiveness that have predictive validity.
(2) Demonstrates measurable impact of prior graduates on student learning,
including impact of graduates teaching in qualifying licensure areas.
(3) Demonstrates high rates of graduates passing exams required for teacher
licensure.
(4) Provides curricular and co-curricular enhancements in leadership, facilitates
learning for diverse learners, and promotes community engagement,
classroom management, and reflection and assessment.
(5) Requires at least a minor concentration of study in the subject area that the
candidate may teach.
(6) Provides early and frequent internship or practical experiences, including the
opportunity for participants to perform practicums in diverse school
environments.
(7) Is approved by the State Board of Education as an educator preparation
program.
(8) For an educator preparation program enrolling loan recipients in a program of
study leading to licensure in elementary education (K-6), provides training
that is aligned with the Science of Reading in accordance with
G.S. 115C-269.20. The Commission shall contract with a third-party entity to
biennially evaluate whether a program identified in this subdivision is
providing training that is aligned with the Science of Reading.
(f1) Optional Program Evaluation and Term Renewal. – The Commission may establish
a process to regularly evaluate institutions of higher education selected to participate in the
Program to ensure that they continue to meet the requirements of subsection (f) of this section.
Page 2 House Bill 1197-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The Commission may, in its discretion, establish term limits for institutions of higher education
selected to participate in the Program and requirements for renewal of those terms.
…
(j) Annual Report. – The Commission, in coordination with the Authority, the
Department of Public Instruction, and the selected educator education programs participating in
the Program shall report no later than January 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee regarding the following:
…
(4) Outcomes from any evaluation process established by the Commission
pursuant to subsection (f1) of this section, including any term limits set by the
Commission, any renewal process established by the Commission and the
parameters of that process, and any institutions that are no longer participating
in the Program as a result."

PART IV. FRIDAY INSTITUTE TO STUDY TEACHING FELLOWS PROGRAM
PARTICIPATION
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the North Carolina State University for the
Friday Institute to study student participation in the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program,
including the reasons some students opt to repay their loans in cash instead of through service.
The Friday Institute shall report this information to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee no later than February 15, 2027.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026. Except as otherwise provided,
this act applies beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year.
House Bill 1197-First Edition Page 3